District of Columbia statutes.
2-307.03

Repealed

District of Columbia Surplus Personal Property Sales Revolving Fund.

Repealed.

Feb. 21 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 703
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1039(c), 52 DCR 7503
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1007, 55 DCR 7598
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1039(c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title: Section 1006 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle C of title I of the act may be cited as the “Surplus Personal Property Sales Revolving Fund Amendment Act of 2008”.